Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-135
Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund is created and shall be administered by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska. The Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund shall include money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, gifts, grants, private contributions, and other sources. Any money in the Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The Board of Regents shall use the fund to award grants to the Nebraska Statewide Arboretum for purposes of tree planting, garden making, community building, and environmental education and outreach.

Laws 2025, LB398, § 70.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.